Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General
§ 29-3-115.
Use of expendable funds.

The expendable funds derived from sixteenth section or lieu lands may be expended for the building and repair of schoolhouses, teachers’ homes, and other school facilities, the purchase of furniture, school vehicles and equipment for same, the payment of teachers’ salaries, and for all other purposes in operating and maintaining the schools of the district to which such funds belong for which other available school funds may be expended. Such funds may also be expended for clearing, draining, reforesting and otherwise improving any sixteenth section lands of township to which any such available funds may belong. Such funds may also be expended for the purpose of paying any drainage district taxes, costs, expenses, and assessments for which the sixteenth section may be liable, and in such case the same shall be paid by the board of education out of any funds which would otherwise be paid over to the school district entitled thereto under the provisions of Sections 29-3-115 through 29-3-123. Such funds may also be expended to pay all reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees incurred to clear the title on any sixteenth section lieu lands located outside the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6606-01; Laws, 1954, ch. 258, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 44; Laws, 1983, ch. 347, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1983).

§ 29-3-117.
Revenues to be paid into maintenance or building fund.

All expendable sixteenth section revenues to which a school district shall become entitled, as provided in Sections 29-3-115 through 29-3-123 from annual rents, interest and other sources shall be paid into the maintenance or building fund of the school district entitled thereto on order of the board of education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6606-05; Laws, 1954, ch. 258, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-119.
Division of funds among school districts.

Where there is only one (1) school district in the township to which the available funds belong, such school district shall be entitled to the whole of such funds, and the funds shall be handled in the manner set forth in this section.

In cases where a township having available funds is occupied by two (2) or more school districts or parts of school districts, the available funds of the township shall be divided between the districts lying wholly or partly within such township in proportion to the number of children residing in that portion of each district which lies within such township and who are enrolled in the schools of that district, as compared to the total number of children residing in such township and enrolled in the schools of all districts lying wholly or partly in that township. For such purpose, annual lists shall be made of all children who reside in the township and who are enrolled in the schools of each district lying wholly or partly in that township, which lists shall be made in accordance with Section 29-3-121. Municipal separate school districts shall be entitled to their pro rata part of such funds in the same manner as other school districts.

Where there is no child residing in a township in which funds are available for distribution and where one or more school districts embrace all or part of any such township, such funds shall be distributed in the following manner:

Where any such township is located wholly within one (1) school district, the available township funds shall be distributed to that school district.

Where any such township having such funds available for distribution is located either in whole or in part in two (2) or more school districts, such available funds shall be distributed to the two (2) or more school districts in proportion to the number of children residing in that part of the two (2) or more school districts which is common or coextensive to each of the school districts, distribution being made on the basis of the enrollment of the school children in their respective school districts.

The school district having jurisdiction and control of the sixteenth section or lieu lands in the township (the “custodial school district”) shall pay to each other school district lying wholly or partly in the township which is entitled to a part of the township funds the district’s pro rata share of the available township funds, as determined from the lists of children prepared pursuant to Section 29-3-121, promptly after collecting such funds. The custodial school district shall make its books and records pertaining to the income and funds of any shared township available for inspection and copying to all other school districts sharing in the income from the township upon reasonable notice of such request. Any district entitled to such funds which is not paid promptly may assert a claim against the custodial school district for its share of the funds not later than twelve (12) months from the end of the calendar year in which the custodial school district collected such funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6606-02; Laws, 1954, ch. 258, § 2; Laws, 1955 Ex Sess, ch. 49, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 517, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 29-3-121.
Superintendent of school district to make lists; recount; costs of recount.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent of each school district to make or cause to be made annual lists of the children enrolled in the schools of such district and who reside in such district, which lists shall be based upon the end of the first month enrollment required to be reported to the State Department of Education for the then current school year. The lists shall be made separately as to the townships in which such children reside. Such lists shall be filed with the superintendent of the custodial school district on or before December 31 of each year, and the lists shall be used in making the division of the available funds of each township during the ensuing calendar year, as provided by Section 29-3-119. The superintendent of the custodial school district shall make such lists available, upon request, to each school district sharing in the revenues of the township. Any school district failing to timely provide the list to the superintendent of the custodial school district shall forfeit its right to such funds unless the school board of the custodial school district and the school board of the other district or districts entitled to such funds have executed a written agreement providing for the distribution of such funds in a manner agreed upon by the school districts. All such lists shall be retained and preserved by the superintendent of the custodial school district as a public record. Such lists shall not be made, however, as to any township which is wholly within one (1) school district. If any superintendent of a school district participating in the division of such funds shall challenge in writing the accuracy of any such list, the Office of the State Auditor, upon receipt of such challenge, may, in its discretion, order and arrange for and supervise a recount of the children enrolled in the schools of such district and who reside in such district. All costs incurred in conducting the recount shall be borne by the challenging district and the district in which the recount is conducted on a pro rata basis, as determined from the results of the recount. Such costs may be paid from the school district’s share of the available township funds. Such recount, when obtained, shall supersede the original list for the purposes of Sections 29-3-115 through 29-3-123.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6606-03; Laws, 1954, ch. 258, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 517, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 29-3-123.
Lists of educable children required before payment of funds.

It shall be unlawful for any township funds to be expended by the custodial school district or paid over to school districts as provided in Sections 29-3-115 through 29-3-123, where there are two (2) or more school districts or parts of school districts in the township until lists of the children residing in each district or part of district within such township who are enrolled in the schools thereof have been made as required under Section 29-3-121. Such lists shall be made annually before any payment of the expendable sixteenth section revenues shall be made to school districts as provided in Sections 29-3-115 through 29-3-123. Any member of a local school board or any superintendent of a school district who shall order the payment of such funds or who shall issue a pay certificate therefor in violation of the provisions of this section shall be liable upon his bond for the amount so paid.

Nothing in Sections 29-3-115 through 29-3-123 shall repeal or restrict the expenditure of funds by the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County under Chapters 661, 662 and 663, Laws of 1950; or the expenditure by the Board of Supervisors of Adams County of any funds under Chapter 615, Laws of 1950.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6606-06; Laws, 1954, ch. 258, § 6; Laws, 1955 Ex Sess, ch. 49, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 517, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 29-3-125.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-125. [Codes, 1942, § 6626; Laws, 1934, ch. 271]

§ 29-3-127.
Inter-county townships.

Where a township is divided so that parts are situated in different counties, the county in which the sixteenth section or lands in lieu thereof may be situated shall have jurisdiction thereof and of the funds derived from it; and if the section or land in lieu thereof be in several counties, each county has jurisdiction of the part lying in it, or the counties may co-operate in the management thereof. In any case the fund shall be accounted for with each county according to the number of educable children in the part of the township in it as compared with the whole number in the township. Any county now having and hereafter receiving and collecting funds belonging to another county shall immediately thereafter pay over such funds, transfer and sign all notes, deeds of trust, and security for funds loaned out, to the depository of the county entitled thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6774; 1942, § 6614; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278.

§ 29-3-129.
Division of damages to land in two school districts.

Where sixteenth section or lieu land allotted the township in lieu of a sixteenth section shall lie in two (2) or more school districts and trespass shall have been committed on said sixteenth section or lieu land, and suit shall have been filed and money collected because of said trespass or for any cause, it shall be the duty of the board of education where the money shall have been collected and deposited to the credit of the said district, unless the decree or order of the court provides otherwise, to divide said money so collected so that each county shall receive its share in proportion to the area in said sixteenth section lying in or allotted to each county; and the money, when so paid over to the respective district or districts, shall be placed to the credit of said township fund, to be invested and the interest therefrom to be used as now provided by law. This method of division provided herein shall apply to moneys collected and paid into any district treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6615; Laws, 1932, ch. 326; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-131.
Expenses incurred.

The expenses incurred by the board of education for the performance of their duties under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid out of proper sixteenth section funds.

The boards of education are also authorized to expend reasonable sums from the school land trust expendable funds, for school land management assistance when the needed assistance is not available from the Secretary of State or other public agencies within the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6783; 1942, § 6624; Laws, 1926, ch. 324; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 47; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 29-3-132.
Effect of chapter on power of other entities to make zoning and land use laws, ordinances or regulations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supersede or modify any power or authority of a county, municipality, or combination thereof, or any zoning or planning board or agency, or similar public authority, to adopt and enforce zoning or land use laws, ordinances or regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-133.
Construction of roads or streets upon lands in certain counties; authorization.

The board of supervisors of any county within the state having a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000) according to the latest federal census, upon receipt of a resolution adopted by the county board of education of any such county requesting it so to do, is authorized and empowered to construct roads or streets upon any sixteenth section lands lying within the boundaries of any municipality in such county having a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) according to the latest federal census.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 370, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1974).

§ 29-3-135.
Construction of roads or streets upon lands in certain counties; payment of cost.

The cost of the construction of any roads or streets performed under the terms of Section 29-3-133 shall be paid upon the order of the board of supervisors of any such county by the county board of education of such county out of any funds which would otherwise be paid over to the school district entitled to the revenues from the sixteenth section land upon which any such construction is done.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 370, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1974).

§ 29-3-137.
Disbursement of funds to Chickasaw counties; powers and duties of State Department of Education; issuance of promissory notes by school districts in Chickasaw counties to purchase school buses.

Beginning with the 1985-1986 fiscal year the Legislature of the State of Mississippi shall appropriate to the State Department of Education a sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) to be disbursed to the Chickasaw counties, and an additional One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) each succeeding fiscal year thereafter until a maximum appropriation of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) is made for the fiscal year 1989-1990. Beginning with the appropriation for the 1990-1991 fiscal year, the amount appropriated under the provisions of this section shall not exceed the total average annual expendable revenue per teacher unit received by the Choctaw counties from school lands, or Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), whichever is the lesser.

The State Department of Education is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to allocate for distribution such funds appropriated each year under subsection (1) of this section in proportion to the number of teacher units allotted under the minimum program, to such school districts affected by the sale of Chickasaw cession school lands. School districts not wholly situated in Chickasaw cession affected territory shall receive a prorated amount of such allocation based on the percentage of such lands located within the district. Provided further, that the State Department of Education shall in addition deduct from each affected school district’s allocation the amount such district shall receive from interest payments from the Chickasaw School Fund under Section 212, Mississippi Constitution of 1890 for each fiscal year. The total number of teacher units in the Chickasaw counties shall be computed by the State Department of Education. The department shall document the foregoing computation in its annual budget request for the appropriation to the Chickasaw School Fund, and shall revise its budget request under such formula as the average annual revenues from sixteenth section school lands fluctuate.

[Repealed]

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 23, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 432, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1988).

§ 29-3-139.
Disbursement of funds under Section 29-3-137 as affecting sums paid under Section 212 of Mississippi Constitution.

In no event shall any sums to be paid to the Chickasaw counties on schools therein pursuant to Section 212, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, be reduced by operation of this to an amount below that required by Section 212. It is the intent of the Legislature to increase the annual appropriation to the Chickasaw counties in order to equitably compensate them for each acre of sixteenth section land which they have lost through sale by the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 23, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 29-3-141.
County board of education to ascertain whether county has title to Chickasaw lands; lease of lands.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 29-1-63, it shall be the duty of the county board of education in any county within the Chickasaw cession to ascertain whether or not such county has title to any Chickasaw lands to which it may, by law, be entitled by virtue of long-term leases. If it is determined that any such land does exist, the board shall proceed to settle the title to such property and, if possible, lease the land pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3, Title 29, Mississippi Code of 1972, applicable to the management of sixteenth section and lieu lands.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 23, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1985.